Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202516-617.01
Improvement, defined.

As used in sections 16-617 to 16-649, improvement shall include, but shall not be limited to, paving, repaving, graveling, grading, curbing, guttering, and the construction and replacement of pedestrian walks, plazas, malls, landscaping, lighting systems, and permanent facilities in an improvement district.

Laws 1967, c. 67, § 2, p. 219;

Laws 2025, LB90, § 2.